Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1914
Violations; penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 18-1901 to 18-1913, or of any lawful ordinance or rules and regulations, authorized hereby, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars nor less than five dollars for each and every violation thereof. If such person holds a plumber's license he shall forfeit the same, and it shall be void, and he shall not be entitled to another plumber's license for one year after such forfeiture is declared against him by the board.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 14, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 5287;

C.S.1922, § 4510;

C.S.1929, § 19-314;

R.S.1943, § 19-314.